North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-292.
Conveyance of land used for commercial hazardous waste disposal facility to the State.

No land may be used for a commercial hazardous waste disposal facility until fee simple title to the land has been conveyed to this State. In consideration for the conveyance, the State shall enter into a lease agreement with the grantor for a term equal
to the estimated life of the facility in which the State will be the lessor and the grantor the lessee. The lease agreement shall specify that for an annual rent of fifty dollars ($50.00), the lessee shall be allowed to use the
land for the development and operation of a hazardous waste disposal facility. The lease agreement shall provide that the lessor or any person authorized by the lessor shall at all times have the right to enter without a search
warrant or permission of the lessee upon any and all parts of the premises for monitoring, inspection and all other purposes necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article. The lessee shall remain fully liable for all damages,
losses, personal injury or property damage which may result or arise out of the lessee’s operation of the facility, and for compliance with regulatory requirements concerning insurance, bonding for closure and post-closure costs,
monitoring and other financial or health and safety requirements as required by applicable law and rules. The State, as lessor, shall be immune from liability except as otherwise provided by statute. The lease shall be transferable
with the written consent of the lessor and the consent will not be unreasonably withheld. In the case of a transfer of the lease, the transferee shall be subject to all terms and conditions that the State deems necessary to ensure
compliance with applicable laws and rules. If the lessee or any successor in interest fails in any material respect to comply with any applicable law, rule or permit condition, or with any term or condition of the lease, the State
may terminate the lease after giving the lessee written notice specifically describing the failure to comply and upon providing the lessee a reasonable time to comply. If the lessee does not effect compliance within the reasonable
time allowed, the State may reenter and take possession of the premises.

Notwithstanding the termination of the lease by either the lessee or the lessor for any reason, the lessee shall remain liable for, and be obligated to perform, all acts necessary or required by law, rule, permit condition or the lease for the permanent
closure of the site until the site has either been permanently closed or until a substituted operator has been secured and has assumed the obligations of the lessee.

In the event of changes in laws or rules applicable to the facility which make continued operation by the lessee impossible or economically infeasible, the lessee shall have the right to terminate the lease upon giving the State reasonable notice of not
less than six months, in which case the lessor shall have the right to secure a substitute lessee and operator.

In the event of termination of the lease by the lessor as provided in subsection (a) of this section, or by the lessee as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the lessee shall be paid the fair market value of any improvements made to the leased
premises less the costs to the lessor resulting from termination of the lease and securing a substitute lessee and operator. However, the lessor shall have no obligation to secure a substitute lessee or operator and may require
the lessee to permanently close the facility.

History.
1981, c. 704, s. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 168, s. 12.

§ 130A-293.
Local ordinances prohibiting hazardous waste facilities invalid; petition to preempt local ordinance.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to maintain a uniform system for the management of hazardous waste and to place limitations upon the exercise by all units of local government in North Carolina of the power to regulate the management of hazardous
waste by means of special, local, or private acts or resolutions, ordinances, property restrictions, zoning regulations, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any authority granted to counties, municipalities, or other local authorities
to adopt local ordinances, including but not limited to those imposing taxes, fees, or charges or regulating health, environment, or land use, any local ordinance that prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting the establishment
or operation of a hazardous waste facility that the Secretary has preempted pursuant to subsections (b) through (f) of this section, shall be invalid to the extent necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Chapter. To this end,
all provisions of special, local, or private acts or resolutions are repealed that:

Prohibit the transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

Prohibit the siting of a hazardous waste facility within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

Place any restriction or condition not placed by this Article upon the transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste, or upon the siting of a hazardous waste facility within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

In any manner are in conflict or inconsistent with the provisions of this Article.

(a1)
No special, local, or private act or resolution enacted or taking effect hereafter may be construed to modify, amend, or repeal any portion of this Article unless it expressly provides for such by specific
references to the appropriate section of this Article. Further to this end, all provisions of local ordinances, including those regulating land use, adopted by counties, municipalities, or other local authorities that
prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the establishment or operation of a hazardous waste facility are invalidated to the extent preempted by the Secretary pursuant to this section.

When a hazardous waste facility would be prevented from construction or operation by a county, municipal, or other local ordinance, the operator of the proposed facility may petition the Secretary to review the matter. After receipt of a petition, the
Secretary shall hold a hearing in accordance with the procedures in subsection (c) of this section and shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt the local ordinance to allow for the establishment and operation of the
facility.

When a petition described in subsection (b) of this section has been filed with the Secretary, the Secretary shall hold a public hearing to consider the petition. The public hearing shall be held in the affected locality within 60 days after receipt of
the petition by the Secretary. The Secretary shall give notice of the public hearing by:

Publication in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the county or counties where the facility is or is to be located or operated, once a week for three consecutive weeks, the first notice appearing at least 30 days prior to the scheduled
date of the hearing; and

First class mail to persons who have requested notice. The Secretary shall maintain a mailing list of persons who request notice in advance of the hearing pursuant to this section. Notice by mail shall be complete upon deposit of a copy of the notice
in a post-paid wrapper addressed to the person to be notified at the address that appears on the mailing list maintained by the Board, in a post office or official depository under the exclusive care and custody of the
United States Postal Service.

(c1)
Any interested person may appear before the Secretary at the hearing to offer testimony. In addition to testimony before the Secretary, any interested person may submit written evidence to the Secretary
for the Secretary’s consideration. At least 20 days shall be allowed for receipt of written comment following the hearing.

A local zoning or land-use ordinance is presumed to be valid and enforceable to the extent the zoning or land-use ordinance imposes requirements, restrictions, or conditions that are generally applicable to development, including, but not limited to,
setback, buffer, and stormwater requirements, unless the Secretary makes a finding of fact to the contrary. The Secretary shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt local ordinances so as to allow for the establishment
and operation of the facility no later than 60 days after conclusion of the hearing. The Secretary shall preempt a local ordinance only if the Secretary makes all of the following findings:

That there is a local ordinance that would prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the establishment or operation of a hazardous waste facility.

That the proposed facility is needed in order to establish adequate capability to meet the current or projected hazardous waste management needs of this State or to comply with the terms of any interstate agreement for the management of hazardous waste
to which the State is a party and therefore serves the interests of the citizens of the State as a whole.

That all legally required State and federal permits or approvals have been issued by the appropriate State and federal agencies or that all State and federal permit requirements have been satisfied and that the permits or approvals have been denied or
withheld only because of the local ordinance.

That local citizens and elected officials have had adequate opportunity to participate in the siting process.

That the construction and operation of the facility will not pose an unreasonable health or environmental risk to the surrounding locality and that the facility operator has taken or consented to take reasonable measures to avoid or manage foreseeable
risks and to comply to the maximum feasible extent with applicable local ordinances.

(d1)
If the Secretary does not make all of the findings under subsection (d) of this section, the Secretary shall not preempt the challenged local ordinance. The Secretary’s decision shall be in writing and
shall identify the evidence submitted to the Secretary plus any additional evidence used in arriving at the decision.

The decision of the Secretary shall be final unless a party to the action files a written appeal under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, as modified by

G.S. 7A-29

and this section, within 30 days of the date of the decision. The record on appeal shall consist of all materials and information submitted to or considered by the Secretary, the Secretary’s written decision, a complete
transcript of the hearing, all written material presented to the Secretary regarding the location of the facility, the specific findings required by subsection (d) of this section, and any minority positions on the specific findings
required by subsection (d) of this section. The scope of judicial review shall be that the court may affirm the decision of the Secretary, or may remand the matter for further proceedings, or may reverse or modify the decision
if the substantial rights of the parties may have been prejudiced because the agency findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Unsupported by substantial evidence admissible under G.S. 150B-29(a) or

G.S. 150B-30

in view of the entire record as submitted; or

Arbitrary or capricious.

(e1) If the court reverses or modifies the decision of the agency, the judge shall set out in writing, which writing shall become part of the record, the reasons for the reversal or modification.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by this procedure, the provisions of Rule 6(a) of the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

, shall apply.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 168, s. 13.

History.
1981, c. 704, s. 5; 1983, s. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 973, ss. 3-5; 1987, c. 827, s. 249; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 993, s. 28; c. 1082, s. 13; 1989, c. 168, s. 13; 1993, c. 501, s. 13; 2001-474, s. 17; 2007-107,
s. 1.10(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-107, s. 1.10.(a), effective June 26, 2007, substituted “this Article” for “Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes” in subdivisions (a)(3) and (a)(4); in subsection (a1), in the first sentence, substituted “this Article” for
“Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes” the first time it appears, and “this Article” for “this Part” the second time it appears; in the introductory paragraph of subsection (d), added the first sentence and deleted “five”
following “makes all” in the last sentence; substituted “all of the findings under subsection (d) of this section” for “all five findings set out above” in subsection (d1); and made minor stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A city or county cannot enact an ordinance which prohibits the establishment of a hazardous waste facility within its city or county limits.
See opinion of Attorney General to O.W. Strickland, Head, Solid & Hazardous Waste Management Branch, Environmental Health Section, 49 N.C.A.G. 178 (1980), rendered under former G.S. 130-166.16 et seq.

Governor does not have authority to issue moratorium on granting of permits
for hazardous waste facilities in this State. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Tom Karnoski, Hazardous Waste Treatment Commission, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 73 (1986).